Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201268-2002
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the
Children's Health and Treatment Act are to:

(1) Require
that the guidelines and criteria that the Department of Health and Human Services
utilizes to determine medical necessity for services under the medical assistance
program be published by the department on its web site and web sites of its
contractors for managed care and administrative services. The treating guidelines
and criteria shall be referenced specifically to providers when utilized as
a determination of medical necessity under the medical assistance program.
Treating guidelines and criteria in effect on July 19, 2012, shall be published
on such web sites within thirty days after July 19, 2012. Notice of changes
to treating guidelines and criteria shall be given to providers and time for
public comment provided at least sixty days prior to implementation of such
changes; and

(2) Require that the department collect and report on authorization
and denial rates for behavioral health services for children under nineteen
years of age.

Laws 2012, LB1063, § 2.
July 19, 2012